North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 44. Unfair Practices by Handlers of Fruits and Vegetables.

§§ 106-496 through 106-501.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-113, s. 1(a), effective January 1, 2019.

History.

G.S. 106-496

; 1941, c. 359, s. 1; 1971, c. 1064, s. 1; repealed by 2018-113, s. 1(a), effective January 1, 2019; G.S. 106-497; 1941, c. 359, s. 2; 1971, c. 1064, s. 2; repealed by 2018-113, s. 1(a), effective January 1, 2019; G.S. 106-498; 1941, c. 359, s. 3; 1967, c. 154; 1971, c. 1064, s. 3; repealed by 2018-113, s. 1(a), effective January 1, 2019; G.S. 106-499; 1941, c. 359, s. 4; 1971, c. 1064, s. 4; repealed by 2018-113, s. 1(a), effective January 1, 2019; G.S. 106-500; 1941, c. 359, s. 5; 1971, c. 1064, ss. 5, 6; repealed by 2018-113, s. 1(a), effective January 1, 2019; G.S. 106-501; 1941, c. 359, s. 6; 1993, c. 539, s. 792; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2018-113, s. 1(a), effective January 1, 2019.